District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.06

Selection criteria.

(a)

Applicants shall be competitively reviewed and selected for participation in the Program based upon the following criteria:

(1)

Professional qualifications and relevant experience, including board eligibility or certification in his or her specialty, professional achievements, and other indicators of competency received from supervisors, department chairs, and program directors; and

(2)

A demonstrated commitment to serve in a HPSA or MUA.

(b)

Preferential consideration will be given to:

(1)

Residents of the District of Columbia;

(2)

Graduates of accredited District of Columbia health professions schools or program;

(3)

Residents of a HPSA or MUA within the District of Columbia;

(4)

Applicants that are immediately eligible and available for service;

(5)

Applicants that commit to longer periods of service;

(6)

Applicants whose service obligation site is also a qualified Medical Homes DC provider;

(7)

Applicants who are fluent in Spanish, Chinese, Vietnamese, Korean, or Amharic; and

(8)

Applicants who have experience at a community-based primary care facility or attended a community-based health profession educational institution.

(c)

For applicants practicing at a service obligation site at the time of application to the Program, preferential consideration shall be given to those individuals who have less than 3 years of employment at the facility.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 7, 53 DCR 61
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5033(c), 55 DCR 7598
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (b), deleted “and” from the end of par. (5), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of par. (6), and added pars. (7) and (8).